North Carolina, session 2025, SB140.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to My Brother's Keeper of
Charlotte, a nonprofit organization, to support programs that improve the outcomes for boys and
young men of color.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S140-v-1*